Utah statutes.
26-1-35.   Content and form of certificates and reports.

(1)  Certificates, certifications, forms, reports, other documents and records, and the form of communication between persons required by this title shall be prepared in the form prescribed by department rule.

(2)  Certificates, certifications, forms, reports, or other documents and records, and communications between persons required by this title may be signed, filed, verified, registered, and stored by photographic, electronic, or other means as prescribed by department rule.

